Utah statutes.
72-10-412.   Violations of chapter or rulings -- Misdemeanor -- Remedies of political subdivisions.

(1)  Each violation of this part or of any regulations, orders, or rulings promulgated or made pursuant to this part, shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(2) (a)  A political subdivision or agency adopting zoning regulations under this part may institute in any court of competent jurisdiction, an action to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of this part, or of airport zoning regulations adopted under this part, or of any order or ruling made in connection with their administration or enforcement.

(b)  The court shall adjudge to the plaintiff the relief, by way of injunction or otherwise, as may be proper under all the facts and circumstances of the case, in order fully to effectuate the purposes of this part and of the regulations adopted and orders and rulings made pursuant to them.

